src/unidades/regras.aff
# Múltiplos (potencias de 10, de k a Y)
PFX     1001     Y     8
PFX     1001     0     Y . # 1 000 000 000 000 000 000 000 000
PFX     1001     0     Z . # 1 000 000 000 000 000 000 000
PFX     1001     0     E . # 1 000 000 000 000 000 000
PFX     1001     0     P . # 1 000 000 000 000 000
PFX     1001     0     T . # 1 000 000 000 000
PFX     1001     0     G . # 1 000 000 000
PFX     1001     0     M . # 1 000 000
PFX     1001     0     k . # 1 000

PFX     1002     Y     2
PFX     1002     0     h . # 100
PFX     1002     0     da . # 10

# Submúltiplos (potencias de 10).
PFX     1003     Y     10
PFX     1003     0     d . # 0,1
PFX     1003     0     c . # 0,01
PFX     1003     0     m . # 0,001
PFX     1003     0     µ . # 0,000 001
PFX     1003     0     n . # 0,000 000 001
PFX     1003     0     p . # 0,000 000 000 001
PFX     1003     0     f . # 0,000 000 000 000 001
PFX     1003     0     a . # 0,000 000 000 000 000 001
PFX     1003     0     z . # 0,000 000 000 000 000 000 001
PFX     1003     0     y . # 0,000 000 000 000 000 000 000 001

# Múltiplos (potencias de 2).
PFX     1004     Y     8
PFX     1004     0     Yi . # 2⁸⁰
PFX     1004     0     Zi . # 2⁷⁰
PFX     1004     0     Ei . # 2⁶⁰
PFX     1004     0     Pi . # 2⁵⁰
PFX     1004     0     Ti . # 2⁴⁰
PFX     1004     0     Gi . # 2³⁰
PFX     1004     0     Mi . # 2²⁰
PFX     1004     0     ki . # 2¹⁰
